Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-802
Judicial nominating commission; residence requirements.

Except for the judge of the Supreme Court who is required to be a member of a judicial nominating commission, each member or alternate member of a commission shall be a resident of the judicial district or area of the state served by such commission. Except for the Chief Justice, the member of the Supreme Court designated to serve on a particular nominating commission shall not be a member who was originally selected from the district served by such nominating commission.

Laws 1963, c. 124, § 2, p. 472;

Laws 1973, LB 110, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 251, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 303, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB388, § 1.